Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Article 10. Employees First Hired on or after July 1, 2006.
Sec. 39.35.890.
Occupational disability benefits and reemployment of disabled employees.

An employee is eligible for an occupational disability benefit if employment is terminated because of a total and apparently permanent occupational disability before the employee’s normal retirement date.

The occupational disability benefits accrue beginning the first day of the month following termination of employment as a result of the disability and are payable the last day of the month. If a final determination granting the benefit is not made in time to pay the benefit when due, a retroactive payment shall be made to cover the period of deferment. The last payment shall be for the first month in which the disabled employee

dies;

recovers from the disability;

fails to meet the requirements under (f), (j), or (m) of this section; or

reaches normal retirement age.

If the disabled employee becomes ineligible to receive occupational disability benefits before the normal retirement date, the disabled employee shall then be entitled to receive retirement benefits if the employee would have been eligible for the benefit had employment continued during the period of disability. The period of disability constitutes membership service in regard to determining eligibility for retirement.

The monthly amount of an occupational disability benefit is 40 percent of the disabled employee’s gross monthly compensation at the time of termination due to disability. Notwithstanding AS

39.35.790(b)

, at the time a member is appointed to disability, the member becomes fully vested in the employer contributions made under AS

39.35.750(a)

. A disabled member is fully vested in the contributions to the member’s individual account made under this subsection. An employee is not entitled to elect distributions from the employee’s individual contribution account under AS

39.35.810

while the employee is receiving disability benefits under this section. While an employee is receiving disability benefits, based on the disabled employee’s gross monthly compensation at the time of termination due to disability, the employer shall make contributions

to the employee’s individual account under AS

39.35.730

on behalf of the employee, without deduction from the employee’s disability payments; and

on behalf of the employee under AS

39.35.750

.

An employee is not entitled to an occupational disability benefit unless the employee files an application for an occupational disability benefit with the administrator within 90 days after the date of terminating employment. If the employee is unable to meet a filing requirement of this subsection, the filing requirement may be waived by the administrator if there are extraordinary circumstances that resulted in the employee’s inability to meet the filing requirement.

A disabled employee receiving an occupational disability benefit shall undergo a medical examination as often as the administrator considers advisable, but not more frequently than once each year. The administrator shall determine the place of the examination and engage the physician or physicians. If, in the judgment of the administrator, the examination indicates that the retired employee is no longer incapacitated because of a total and apparently permanent occupational disability, the administrator may not issue further disability benefits to the employee.

A disabled employee’s occupational disability benefit terminates the last day of the month in which the disabled employee first qualifies for normal retirement. At that time, the employee’s retirement benefit shall be determined under the provisions of AS

39.35.820

—

39.35.840

,

39.35.870

, and

39.35.880

. An employee whose occupational disability benefit terminates under this subsection shall be considered to have retired directly from the plan.

Notwithstanding (g) of this section, at the time a peace officer or firefighter receiving occupational disability benefits under this section first attains eligibility for normal retirement, the employee shall irrevocably elect to receive retirement benefits in the amount calculated as the

employee’s retirement benefit calculated under the provisions of AS

39.35.820

—

39.35.840

; or

employee’s retirement benefit calculated as if the provisions of AS

39.35.370(c)

were to apply; however, pension benefits paid under this paragraph must be paid first from the peace officer’s or firefighter’s individual contribution account, and the remaining benefits must be paid from the trust account established under AS

39.35.750(e)

; the peace officer or firefighter may not elect other distributions from the peace officer’s or firefighter’s individual contribution account under AS

39.35.810

.

Notwithstanding (b)(3) of this section, a peace officer or firefighter who retires under (h) of this section is not subject to the requirements of (f) or (j) of this section during retirement.

An employee appointed to disability benefits shall apply to the division of vocational rehabilitation within 30 days after the date disability benefits commence. The employee shall be enrolled in a rehabilitation program if the employee meets the eligibility requirements of the division of vocational rehabilitation. Unless the employee demonstrates cause, benefits shall terminate at the end of the first month in which a disabled employee

fails to report to the division of vocational rehabilitation;

is certified by the division of vocational rehabilitation as failing to cooperate in a vocational rehabilitation program;

fails to interview for a job; or

fails to accept a position offered.

Upon the death of a disabled employee who is receiving or is entitled to receive an occupational disability benefit, the administrator shall pay the surviving spouse a surviving spouse’s pension, equal to 40 percent of the employee’s monthly compensation at the time of termination of employment because of occupational disability. If there is no surviving spouse, the administrator shall pay the survivor’s pension in equal parts to the dependent children of the employee. While the monthly survivor’s pension is being paid, the survivor is not entitled to elect distributions from the employee’s individual contribution account under AS

39.35.810

. The first payment of the surviving spouse’s pension or of a dependent child’s pension shall accrue from the first day of the month following the employee’s death and is payable the last day of the month. The last payment shall be made the last day of the last month in which there is an eligible surviving spouse or dependent child, or the last day of the month in which the employee would have first qualified for normal retirement if the employee had survived, whichever day is sooner. A retirement benefit shall be determined under the provisions of AS

39.35.820

—

39.35.840

,

39.35.870

, and

39.35.880

based on the date the employee would have first qualified for normal retirement if the employee had survived. In addition to payment of the member’s individual account, the surviving spouse or, if there is no surviving spouse, the surviving dependent children of the member, shall receive an additional benefit in an amount equal to the accumulated contributions that would have been made to the deceased member’s individual account under AS

39.35.730(a)

and

39.35.750(a)

, based on the deceased member’s gross monthly compensation at the time of occupational disability, from the time of the member’s death to the date the member would have first qualified for normal retirement if the member had survived. Earnings shall be allocated to the additional benefit calculated under this subsection based on the actual rate of return, net of expenses, of the trust account established under AS

39.35.750(e)

over the period that the contributions would have been made. This additional amount and allocated earnings shall be paid in the same manner as determined for the member’s individual account under AS

39.35.820

—

39.35.860

to the extent permitted by the Internal Revenue Service. For the purpose of determining eligibility of an employee’s survivor who is receiving a benefit under this subsection for medical benefits under AS

39.35.870

—

39.35.880

, an employee who died while receiving disability benefits shall be considered to have retired directly from the plan on the date the employee would have first qualified for normal retirement if the employee had survived. The period during which the employee was eligible for a disability benefit and the period during which a survivor’s pension is paid to a survivor under this subsection each constitute membership service for the purposes of determining eligibility for medical benefits under AS

39.30.300

—

39.30.495

and AS

39.35.700

—

39.35.990

.

While a survivor under (k) of this section is receiving a survivor’s pension, the employer of the deceased employee shall make contributions with respect to the survivor based on the deceased employee’s gross monthly compensation at the time of termination due to disability

that would have been paid to the employee’s individual account under AS

39.35.730

and

39.35.750(a)

, to the trust account established under AS

39.35.750(e)

, without deduction from the survivor’s pension; and

to the appropriate accounts and funds under AS

39.35.750(b)

— (e).

In this section, “occupational disability” means a physical or mental condition that the administrator determines presumably permanently prevents an employee from satisfactorily performing the employee’s usual duties or the duties of another comparable position or job available to the employee and for which the employee is qualified by training or education; however, the proximate cause of the condition must be a bodily injury sustained, or a hazard undergone, while in the performance and within the scope of the employee’s duties and not the proximate result of the wilful negligence of the employee.

History.

(§ 122 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am §§ 91 — 97 ch 20 SLA 2007)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (

l

) was enacted as (m); relettered in 2007, at which time former subsection (

l

) was relettered as (m), and an internal reference in subsection (b) was conformed accordingly.

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 2 AAC 35, art. 2.

For benefits under the defined benefit plan ( AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

), see 2 AAC 35, art. 3.

Sec. 39.35.891.
Disability benefit and disabled peace officer or firefighter retirement benefit adjustment.

Once each year, the administrator shall increase disability benefits and retirement benefits elected by disabled peace officers or firefighters under AS

39.35.890(h)(2)

. The amount of the increase is a percentage of the current disability benefit or retirement benefit equal to the lesser of 75 percent of the increase in the cost of living in the preceding calendar year or nine percent.

If a disabled member was not receiving a benefit during the entire preceding calendar year, the increase in the benefit under this section shall be adjusted by multiplying it by a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of months for which the benefit was received in the preceding calendar year and the denominator of which is 12.

If a disabled peace officer or firefighter elects to receive a retirement benefit in the amount calculated under AS

39.35.890(h)(2)

, the administrator shall, at the time the disabled peace officer or firefighter is appointed to retirement, increase the retirement benefit by a percentage equal to the total cumulative percentage that has been applied to the disabled peace officer’s or firefighter’s disability benefit under this section.

An increase in benefit payments under this section is effective July 1 of each year and is based on the percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for urban wage earners and clerical workers for Anchorage, Alaska, during the previous calendar year, as determined by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics.

Benefit adjustments under this section shall terminate the last day of the month following the date on which a disabled member is no longer receiving a disability benefit under AS

39.35.890

, unless the member is a disabled peace officer or firefighter and has chosen a retirement benefit under AS

39.35.890(h)(2)

.

History.

(§ 98 ch 20 SLA 2007)

Sec. 39.35.892.
Occupational death benefit.

If (1) the death of an employee occurs before the employee’s retirement and before the employee’s normal retirement date, (2) the proximate cause of death is a bodily injury sustained or a hazard undergone while in the performance and within the scope of the employee’s duties, and (3) the injury or hazard is not the proximate result of wilful negligence of the employee, a monthly survivor’s pension shall be paid to the surviving spouse. If there is no surviving spouse or if the spouse later dies, the monthly survivor’s pension shall be paid in equal parts to the dependent children of the employee.

The first payment of the surviving spouse’s pension or of a dependent child’s pension shall be made for the month following the month in which the employee dies. Payments shall cease on the last day of the month in which there is no longer an eligible spouse or eligible dependent child, or the last day of the month following the earliest date the employee would have first qualified for normal retirement if the employee had survived, whichever day is sooner.

The monthly survivor’s pension in (b) of this section for survivors of employees who were not peace officers or firefighters is 40 percent of the employee’s monthly compensation in the month in which the employee dies. The monthly survivor’s pension in (b) of this section for survivors of employees who were peace officers or firefighters is 50 percent of the monthly compensation in the month in which the employee dies. While the monthly survivor’s pension is being paid, the survivor is not entitled to elect distributions from the employee’s individual contribution account under AS

39.35.810

, except as required by AS

39.35.840

. While the monthly survivor’s pension is being paid, the employer shall make contributions with respect to the employee’s surviving spouse and employee’s surviving dependent children based on the deceased employee’s gross monthly compensation at the time of occupational death

that would have been paid to the employee’s individual account under AS

39.35.730

and

39.35.750(a)

, to the trust account established under AS

39.35.750(e)

, without deduction from the survivor’s pension; and

to the appropriate accounts and funds under AS

39.35.750(b)

— (e).

If an employee’s death is caused by an act of assault, assassination, or terrorism directly related to the person’s status as an employee, whether the act occurs on or off the employee’s job site, the death shall be considered to have occurred in the performance of and within the scope of the employee’s duties for purposes of (a)(2) of this section. If the expressed or apparent motive and intent of the perpetrator of the harm inflicted upon the employee was due to the performance of the employee’s job duties or employment, the death shall be considered to be directly related to the employee’s status as an employee. An employee’s job duties are those performed within the course and scope of the person’s employment with an employer.

On the date the employee would have first qualified for normal retirement if the employee had survived, the retirement benefit shall be determined under the provisions of AS

39.35.820

—

39.35.840

,

39.35.870

, and

39.35.880

. In addition to payment of the member’s individual account, the surviving spouse or, if there is no surviving spouse, the surviving dependent children of the member, shall receive an additional benefit in an amount equal to the accumulated contributions that would have been made to the deceased member’s individual account under AS

39.35.730(a)

and

39.35.750(a)

, based on the deceased member’s gross monthly compensation at the time of occupational death, from the time of the member’s death to the date the member would have first qualified for normal retirement if the member had survived. Earnings shall be allocated to the additional benefit calculated under this subsection based on the actual rate of return, net of expenses, of the trust account established under AS

39.35.750(e)

over the period that such contributions would have been made. This additional amount and allocated earnings shall be paid in the same manner as determined for the member’s individual account under AS

39.35.820

—

39.35.860

to the extent permitted by the Internal Revenue Service. An employee who died and whose survivors receive occupational death benefits under this section shall be considered to have retired directly from the plan on the date the employee would have first qualified for normal retirement if the employee had survived. The period of time during which a survivor’s pension is paid under this section constitutes membership service for the purpose of determining vesting in employer contributions under AS

39.35.790(b)

and eligibility for medical benefits under AS

39.30.300

—

39.30.495

and AS

39.35.700

—

39.35.990

.

History.

(§ 122 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am §§ 99 — 101 ch 20 SLA 2007)

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 2 AAC 35, art. 2.

Sec. 39.35.893.
Survivor’s pension adjustment.

Once each year, the administrator shall increase payments to a person 60 years of age or older receiving a survivor’s pension under AS

39.35.890(k)

or

39.35.892(c)

and to a person who has received a survivor’s pension under AS

39.35.890(k)

or

39.35.892(c)

for at least five years, who is not otherwise eligible for an increase under this section.

The amount of the increase is a percentage of the current survivor’s pension equal to the lesser of 50 percent of the increase in the cost of living in the preceding calendar year or six percent.

If a survivor was not receiving a pension during the entire preceding calendar year, the increase in the survivor’s pension under this section shall be adjusted by multiplying it by a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of months for which the pension was received in the preceding calendar year and the denominator of which is 12.

The administrator shall increase the initial survivor’s pension paid to a survivor of a member who died while receiving disability benefits by a percentage equal to the total cumulative percentage that has been applied to the member’s disability benefit under AS

39.35.891

.

An increase in benefit payments under this section is effective July 1 of each year and is based on the percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for urban wage earners and clerical workers for Anchorage, Alaska, during the previous calendar year, as determined by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics.

Pension adjustments under this section shall terminate the last day of the month following the date on which a survivor is no longer receiving a survivor’s pension under AS

39.35.890(k)

or

39.35.892(c)

.

History.

(§ 102 ch 20 SLA 2007)

Sec. 39.35.894.
Premiums for retiree major medical insurance coverage upon termination of disability benefits or survivor’s pension.

The premium for retiree major medical insurance coverage payable by an employee whose disability benefit is terminated under AS

39.35.890(g)

or by an eligible survivor whose survivor pension is terminated under AS

39.35.890(k)

or

39.35.892(e)

when the employee would have been eligible for normal retirement if the employee had survived shall be determined under AS

39.35.880(g)(2)

as if the employee or survivor were eligible for Medicare.

History.

(§ 102 ch 20 SLA 2007)

Sec. 39.35.895.
Amendment and termination of plan.

The state has the right to amend the plan at any time and from time to time, in whole or in part, including the right to make retroactive amendments referred to in 26 U.S.C. 401(b).

The plan administrator may not modify or amend the plan retroactively in such a manner as to reduce the benefits of any member accrued to date under the plan by reason of contributions made before the modification or amendment except to the extent that the reduction is permitted by the Internal Revenue Code.

The state may, in its discretion, terminate the plan in whole or part at any time without liability for the termination. If the plan is terminated, all investments remain in force until all individual accounts have been completely distributed under the plan, and, after all plan liabilities are satisfied, excess assets revert to the employer.

Any contribution made by an employer to the plan because of a mistake of fact must be returned to the employer by the administrator within one year after the contribution or discovery, whichever is later.

History.

(§ 122 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 39.35.900.
Exclusive benefit.

The corpus or income of the assets held in trust as required by the plan may not be diverted or used for other than the exclusive benefit of the participants.

If plan benefits are provided through the distribution of annuity or insurance contracts, any refunds or credits in excess of plan benefits due to dividends, earnings, or other experience rating credits, or surrender or cancellation credits, shall be paid to the trust fund.

The assets of the plan may not be used to pay premiums or contributions of the employer under another plan maintained by the employer.

The administrator shall use forfeitures in the fixed benefit account of the plan that arise for any reason, including from termination of employment or death, to reduce employer contributions. Forfeitures may not be applied to increase the benefits of any member.

The administrator shall determine the amount of any fixed benefit that is determined on the basis of actuarial tables using assumptions approved by the commissioner. The amount of benefits is not subject to employer discretion.

History.

(§ 122 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am § 103 ch 20 SLA 2007)

Sec. 39.35.910.
Nonguarantee of returns, rates, or benefit amounts.

The plan created by AS

39.35.700

—

39.35.990

is, with respect to individual accounts, treated as a defined contribution plan, and not a defined benefit plan. The amount of money in the individual account of a participant depends on the amount of contributions and the rate of return from investments of the account that varies over time. If benefits are paid in the form of an annuity, the benefit amount payable is dependent on the amount of money in the account and the interest rates applied and service fees charged by the annuity payor at the time the annuity is purchased from the carrier and benefits are first paid. Nothing in this plan guarantees a participant

a rate of return or interest rate other than that actually earned by the account of the participant, less applicable administrative expenses; or

an annuity based on interest rates or service charges other than interest rates available from and service charges by the annuity payor in effect at the time the annuity is paid.

History.

(§ 122 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am § 104 ch 20 SLA 2007)

Sec. 39.35.920.
Nonguarantee of employment.

The provisions of AS

39.35.700

—

39.35.990

are not a contract of employment between an employer and an employee, nor do they confer a right of an employee to be continued in the employment of an employer, nor are they a limitation of the right of an employer to discharge an employee with or without cause.

History.

(§ 122 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 39.35.930.
Fraud.

A person who knowingly makes a false statement or falsifies or permits to be falsified a record of this plan in an attempt to defraud the plan is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

In this section, “knowingly” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900(a)

.

History.

(§ 122 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Cross references. —

For penalties for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

.

Sec. 39.35.932.
Pension forfeiture.

The provisions of AS

37.10.310

apply to pension benefits under AS

39.35.700

—

39.35.990

.

History.

(§ 53 ch 47 SLA 2007)

Sec. 39.35.940.
Transfer into defined contribution plan by nonvested members of defined benefit plan.

Subject to (i) of this section, an active member of the defined benefit retirement plan of the public employees’ retirement system is eligible to participate in the defined contribution retirement plan established under AS

39.35.700

—

39.35.990

if that member has not vested. Participation in the defined contribution retirement plan is in lieu of participation in the defined benefit retirement plan established under AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

.

A member who has vested in a defined benefit retirement plan is not eligible to transfer under this section.

Each eligible member who elects to participate in the defined contribution retirement plan shall have transferred to a new account the employee contribution account balance held in trust for the member under the defined benefit retirement plan of the public employees’ retirement system. A matching employer contribution shall be made on behalf of that employee to the new account. The employer shall make the matching contribution from funds other than the trust funds of the defined benefit retirement plan established under AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

. The amount of the matching employer contribution shall be subject to, and may not exceed, the limitation of 26 U.S.C. 415(c) during the applicable limitation year as defined by AS

39.35.990

. If the matching employer contribution would exceed the limits during the limitation year in which the transfer occurs, the remaining amount of the matching employer contribution shall be made in the next limitation year, if the limits would not be exceeded.

Upon a transfer, all membership service previously earned under the defined benefit retirement plan shall be nullified for purposes of entitlement to a future benefit under the defined benefit retirement plan but shall be credited for purposes of determining vesting in employer contributions under AS

39.35.790(b)

and eligibility to elect medical benefits under AS

39.35.870

. Membership service allowed for credit toward medical benefits does not include any service credit purchased for employment by an employer who is not a participating employer in this chapter.

An eligible member whose accounts are subject to a qualified domestic relations order may not make an election to participate in the defined contribution retirement plan under this subsection unless the qualified domestic relations order is amended or vacated and court-certified copies of the order are received by the administrator.

As directed by the participant, the board shall transfer or cause to be transferred the appropriate amounts to the designated account. The board shall establish transfer procedures by regulation, but the actual transfer may not be later than 30 days after the effective date of the member’s participation in the defined contribution retirement plan unless the major financial markets for securities available for a transfer are seriously disrupted by an unforeseen event that also causes the suspension of trading on any national securities exchange in the country where the securities were issued. In that event, the 30-day period of time may be extended by a resolution of the board of trustees. Transfers are not commissionable or subject to other fees and may be in the form of securities or cash as determined by the board. Securities shall be valued as of the date of receipt in the participant’s account.

If the board or the administrator receives notification from the United States Department of the Treasury, Internal Revenue Service, that this section or a portion of this section will cause the retirement system under this chapter, or a portion of the retirement system under this chapter, to be disqualified for tax purposes under the Internal Revenue Code, the portion that will cause the disqualification does not apply, and the board and the administrator shall notify the presiding officers of the legislature.

An employee who is eligible to elect transfer to the defined contribution retirement plan must make the election not later than 12 months after the first day of the month following the administrator’s receipt of the notification that the employee’s employer consents to transfers of its employees under (i) of this section. The election to participate in the defined contribution retirement plan must be made in writing on forms and in the manner prescribed by the administrator. Before accepting an election to participate in the defined contribution retirement plan, the administrator must provide the employee planning on making an election to participate in the defined contribution retirement plan with information, including calculations to illustrate the effect of moving the employee’s retirement plan from the defined benefit retirement plan to the defined contribution retirement plan as well as other information to clearly inform the employee of the potential consequences of the employee’s election. An election made under this subsection to participate in the defined contribution retirement plan is irrevocable. Upon making the election, the participant shall be enrolled as a member of the defined contribution retirement plan, the member’s participation in the plan shall be governed by the provisions of AS

39.35.700

—

39.35.990

, and the member’s participation in the defined benefit retirement plan under AS

39.35.115

shall terminate. The participant’s enrollment in the defined contribution retirement plan shall be effective the first day of the month after the administrator receives the completed enrollment forms. An election made by an eligible member who is married is not effective unless the election is signed by the individual’s spouse.

A member may make an election under this section only if the member’s employer participates in both the defined benefit retirement plan and the defined contribution retirement plan and consents to transfers under this section. The employer shall notify the administrator if the employer consents to allowing the employer’s members to choose to transfer from the defined benefit retirement plan to the defined contribution retirement plan under this section. An employer’s notice to allow transfers is irrevocable and applicable to all eligible employees of the employer.

In this section,

“defined benefit retirement plan” means the retirement plan established in AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

;

“defined contribution retirement plan” means the retirement plan established in AS

39.35.700

—

39.35.990

.

History.

(§ 122 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am §§ 105 — 107 ch 20 SLA 2007)

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 2 AAC 35, art. 2.

Sec. 39.35.950.
Request by political subdivision to participate and adoption of resolution.

A municipality or other political subdivision of the state may request to become an employer in this plan. The request shall be made after adoption of a resolution by the legislative body of the political subdivision and after approval of the resolution by the person required by law to approve the resolution. A certified copy of the resolution shall be filed with the administrator. If the administrator approves the request for participation, the political subdivision is an employer of the plan.

History.

(§ 122 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 39.35.955.
Request by public organization to participate and adoption of resolution.

A public organization may request to become an employer in this plan. The request shall be made after adoption of a resolution by the governing body of the public organization. A certified copy of the resolution shall be filed with the administrator. If the administrator approves the request for participation, the public organization is an employer of the plan.

History.

(§ 122 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 39.35.956.
Contractors and employees of contractors excluded from plan.

A person or legal entity providing services to the state or to a political subdivision or public organization on a contractual or fee basis may not participate as an employer in the plan based on those services.

A person may not participate in the plan as an employee or member as the result of performing work for a person providing services under (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 5 ch 29 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

For provision providing for the severability of this section from the remainder of ch. 29, SLA 2016, see sec. 9, ch. 29, SLA 2016 in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effective dates. —

Section 5, ch. 29, SLA 2016, which enacted this section, took effect on September 20, 2016.

Editor's notes. —

Under sec. 8, ch. 29, SLA 2016, this section applies "to contracts entered into on or after September 20, 2016."

Sec. 39.35.957.
Designation of eligible employees, agreement to contribute, and amendment of participation.

A political subdivision or public organization participating in the defined contribution retirement plan under AS

39.35.700

—

39.35.990

shall designate the departments, groups, or other classifications of employees eligible to participate in the plan and, by participating, shall legally be presumed to have agreed to make contributions each year in the amounts required for members of the plan under AS

39.35.750

.

If the employer does not participate in the defined benefit retirement plan under AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

, an employee who is eligible under (a) of this section and who is a member of the defined benefit retirement plan under AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

does not accrue credited service or make contributions under that defined benefit retirement plan, but shall be a member of the defined contribution retirement plan under AS

39.35.700

—

39.35.990

and make contributions under that plan.

An employer may request to amend its participation in the plan to add or exclude departments, groups, or other classifications of employees by filing a resolution as provided by AS

39.35.950

or

39.35.955

with the administrator.

History.

(§ 108 ch 20 SLA 2007)

Sec. 39.35.958.
Termination of participation in the plan.

A political subdivision or public organization may request that its participation in the plan be terminated. The request may be made only after adoption of a resolution by the legislative body of the political subdivision and approval of the resolution by the person required by law to approve the resolution, or, in the case of a public organization, after adoption of a resolution by the governing body of that public organization. A certified copy of the resolution shall be filed with the administrator.

If contributions are not transmitted to the plan within the prescribed time limit, the administrator may grant an extension and shall assess interest on the outstanding contributions at the rate established under AS

39.35.610

. If the political subdivision or public organization is in default at the end of the extension, participation in the plan is terminated, and the political subdivision or public organization shall be sent notice of termination.

When an employer’s participation in the plan is terminated, or when an employer terminates coverage of a department, group, or other classification of employees under AS

39.35.957(c)

, the administrator shall assess the employer a termination cost that the administrator determines is actuarially required to fully fund the costs to the plan for employees whose coverage is terminated, including the cost of providing the employer’s share of retiree health benefits under AS

39.35.880

, occupational disability and occupational death benefits under AS

39.35.890

and

39.35.892

, and pension benefits elected under AS

39.35.890(h)(2)

.

An employee whose coverage under the plan is terminated as a result of termination of an employer’s participation under this section or amendment of the employer’s agreement under AS

39.35.957(c)

shall be considered fully vested in employer contributions under AS

39.35.790(b)

and in the individual account established for the employee under AS 39.30.730. If the employee is later employed with a participating employer, the employee’s membership service earned under the plan during employment with a terminated employer shall be credited for purposes of determining vesting in employer contributions under AS

39.35.790(b)

and eligibility for medical benefits under this chapter and AS

39.30.300

—

39.30.495

.

An employer terminating participation in the plan shall pay termination costs determined by the administrator, or enter into a payment plan acceptable to the administrator, within 60 days after the employer receives notice of its termination costs from the administrator. Termination costs not paid within the prescribed time limit or in accordance with the approved payment plan shall be collected by the administrator in accordance with AS

39.35.610(b)

. Termination of participation by an employer in the plan does not bar future participation by the employer if the employer has paid in full its prior termination costs.

A political subdivision or public organization considering or requesting termination from the plan shall pay the cost associated with obtaining a termination cost study associated with the employer’s termination.

History.

(§ 108 ch 20 SLA 2007)

Sec. 39.35.960.
Membership in teachers’ and public employees’ retirement systems.

A person who is employed at least half-time in the public employees’ defined contribution retirement plan (AS

39.35.700

—

39.35.990

) during the same period that the person is employed at least half-time in a position in the teachers’ defined contribution retirement plan (AS

14.25.310

—

14.25.590

) shall receive credited service under each plan for half-time employment. However, the amount of credited service a person receives under the public employees’ defined contribution retirement plan during a school year may not exceed the amount necessary, when added to the amount of credited service earned during the school year under the teachers’ defined contribution retirement plan, to equal one year of credited service.

History.

(§ 122 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 39.35.965.
Army and air national guard employees.

A regular full-time civilian employee of the Alaska Army National Guard and Air National Guard whose entire salary is paid from allotted federal funds is included in the public employees’ defined contribution retirement plan (AS

39.35.700

—

39.35.990

) if the federal or state government pays the employer’s contributions. If the amount that the federal government may legally contribute to the plan is lower than the required employer’s contribution, the state government shall contribute the difference. If the employer’s contributions are not paid when due, service credit for the period of delinquency may not be granted until the contributions are paid.

History.

(§ 122 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 39.35.970.
North Pacific Fishery Management Council employees.

An employee of the North Pacific Fishery Management Council appointed under 16 U.S.C. 1852(f)(1)(Sec. 302(f)(1) of P.L. 94-265) whose compensation is paid from allotted federal funds is included in the public employees’ defined contribution retirement plan (AS

39.35.700

—

39.35.990

) if the council pays the employer’s contributions. If the employer’s contributions are not paid when due, credited service for the period of delinquency may not be granted until the contributions are paid.

History.

(§ 122 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)